zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 烹饪与烘焙原料/作料 > 可食用烘培装饰品: 食用闪粉和亮粉; 食用图案和蛋糕顶饰; 翻糖和糖膏; 装饰糖和混合装饰糖
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Ingrediente pentru gătit și copt > Decorațiuni comestibile pentru copt: Sclipici și pudră comestibilă; Imagini comestibile și decoruri pentru tort; Fondant și pastă de zahăr; Decoruri de zahăr și mixuri de decoruri
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Prísady na varenie a pečenie > Jedlé ozdoby na pečenie: Jedlé trblietky a prach; Jedlé obrázky a ozdoby na torty; Fondán a cukrová pasta; Posýpky a zmesi na posýpky
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 調理材料・製菓材料 > 製菓用デコレーション: 食用グリッター・ダスト; 食用プリント・ケーキトッパー; フォンダン・シュガーペースト; スプリンクル・スプリンクルミックス
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Ingredienti per cucinare e da forno > Decorazioni da forno commestibili: Glitter e polvere alimentare; Immagini commestibili e cake topper; Fondente e pasta di zucchero; Zuccherini e codette
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Cooking & Baking Ingredients > Edible Baking Decorations: Edible Glitter & Dust; Edible Images & Cake Toppers; Fondant & Sugar Paste; Sprinkles & Sprinkle Mixes
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Koch- & Backzutaten > Essbare Backdekoration: Essbarer Glitzer & Puder; Essbare Bilder & Tortenaufleger; Fondant & Blütenpaste; Streusel & Streuselmischungen
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 烹飪和烘焙食材 > 可食用烘焙裝飾: 食用閃粉與亮粉; 食用相片與蛋糕插牌; 翻糖與糖膏; 裝飾糖粒與綜合糖粒
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Υλικά μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Βρώσιμα διακοσμητικά ζαχαροπλαστικής: Βρώσιμο γκλίτερ και σκόνη; Βρώσιμες εικόνες και διακοσμητικά τούρτας; Φοντάν και ζαχαρόπαστα; Ζαχαρωτά και μείγματα για πασπάλισμα
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Nguyên liệu nấu ăn và nướng bánh > Đồ trang trí bánh ăn được: Nhũ & bột rắc ăn được; Hình ảnh ăn được & đồ cắm trang trí bánh; Fondant & hỗn hợp đường sệt; Kẹo rắc & hỗn hợp kẹo rắc
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ingredience na vaření a pečení > Jedlé dekorace na dorty: Jedlé třpytky a prach; Jedlé obrázky a ozdoby na dort; Fondán a cukrová pasta; Cukrářské zdobení a sypání
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Ingredientes para cozinhar e assar > Decorações de cozinha comestíveis: Purpurina e pó comestíveis; Imagens comestíveis e topos de bolo; Fondant e pasta de açúcar; Granulados e misturas de granulados
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivonta-aineet > Syötävät leivontakoristeet: Syötävät kimalteet ja tomut; Syötävät kuvat ja kakkukoristeet; Sokerimassat; Strösselit ja strösselisekoitukset
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Ingrédients pour la cuisine et la pâtisserie > Décorations comestibles pour pâtisseries: Paillettes et poudres comestibles; Images comestibles et décorations de gâteaux; Fondant et pâte à sucre; Vermicelles et mélanges de vermicelles
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Sastojci za kuhanje i pečenje kolača > Jestivi ukrasi za pečenje: Jestive šljokice i prah; Jestive slike i ukrasi za torte; Fondant i šećerna pasta; Šarene mrvice i mješavine za mrvice
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Maisto gaminimo ir kepimo ingredientai > Valgomosios kepinių dekoracijos: Valgomi blizgučiai ir dulkės; Valgomi paveikslėliai ir tortų papuošimai; Fondantas ir cukraus pasta; Pabarstukai ir pabarstukų mišiniai
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 요리 및 제과/제빵 재료 > 식용 제과/제빵 장식: 식용 글리터 및 더스트; 식용 이미지 및 케이크 토퍼; 폰당 및 슈가 페이스트; 스프링클 및 스프링클 믹스
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Ingrediënten voor koken en bakken > Eetbare bakdecoraties: Eetbare glitter en poeder; Eetbare afbeeldingen en taarttoppers; Fondant en suikerpasta; Strooisels en strooiselmixen
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sestavine za kuhanje in peko > Užitni okraski za peko: Užitne bleščice in prah; Užitne slike in okraski za torte; Fondant in sladkorna pasta; Sladkorne pikice in mešanice sladkornih pikic
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Ingredienser til matlagning og baking > Spiselige bakedekorasjoner: Spiselig glitter og støv; Spiselige bilder og kaketopper; Fondant og sukkerpasta; Strøssel og strøsselblandinger
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Кулинарные и кондитерские ингредиенты > Съедобные украшения для выпечки: Пищевые блестки и кандурин; Пищевая печать и топперы для тортов; Мастика и сахарная паста; Посыпки и смеси для посыпки
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes de cocina y repostería > Decoraciones comestibles para pastelería: Brillantina y polvo comestibles; Imágenes comestibles y adornos para pasteles; Fondant y pasta de azúcar; Chispas y mezclas de chispas
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Pişirme Malzemeleri > Yenilebilir Pasta Süsleri: Yenilebilir sim ve toz boyalar; Yenilebilir resimler ve pasta süsleri; Şeker hamuru ve fondan; Pasta süsleri ve karışımları
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Ingredienser til madlavning og bagning > Spiselige kagedekorationer: Spiseligt glimmer og støv; Spiselige billeder og kagetoppere; Fondant og sukkermasse; Krymmel og krymmelblandinger
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Főzési és sütési összetevők > Ehető sütődíszek: Ehető csillámok és porok; Ehető képek és tortadíszek; Fondant-ok és cukormasszák; Cukorszórások és szóráskeverékek
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes para cozidos e assados > Decorações de bolo comestíveis: Glitter e pó comestíveis; Imagens e topos de bolo comestíveis; Fondant e pasta americana; Granulados e misturas de granulados
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ส่วนผสมในการทำอาหารและการอบ > สิ่งตกแต่งขนมอบที่กินได้: กลิตเตอร์และผงกากเพชรทานได้; รูปภาพทานได้และของตกแต่งหน้าเค้ก; ฟองดองและน้ำตาลปั้น; เกล็ดน้ำตาลตกแต่ง
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Ingredienser för matlagning och bakning > Ätbara bakdekorationer: Ätbart glitter & puder; Ätbara bilder & tårtdekorationer; Fondant & sockerpasta; Strössel & strösselblandningar
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Съставки за готвене и печене > Ядливи декорации за печива: Ядлив блясък и прах; Ядливи картинки и топери за торти; Фондан и захарна паста; Поръски и смеси за поръсване
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Składniki do gotowania i pieczenia > Jadalne dekoracje do wypieków: Jadalny brokat i pyłek; Jadalne opłatki i toppery na tort; Lukier plastyczny i masa cukrowa; Posypki i mieszanki posypek